Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-710
Special assessments; expenditure; limitations.

All money received on special assessments shall be held by the treasurer as a special fund to be applied to the payment of the improvement for which the assessment was made, and such money shall be used for no other purpose whatever, unless to reimburse such corporation for money expended for such improvement.

Laws 1879, § 90, p. 227;

R.S.1913, § 5188;

C.S.1922, § 4375;

C.S.1929, § 17-573;

R.S.1943, § 17-710.